Georgia, session 2025_26, HB783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
(1) "Ad valorem taxes for educational purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for
educational purposes levied by, for, or on behalf of the Columbia County school district,
including, but not limited to, any ad valorem taxes to pay interest on and to retire county
school district bonded indebtedness.
H. B. 783
- 1 -

LC 47 3625/AP
(2) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended, with the additional qualification that it shall include not more
than five contiguous acres of homestead property.
(b) Each resident of the Columbia County school district is granted an exemption on such
person's homestead from Columbia County school district ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes in the amount of $8,000.00 of the assessed value of that homestead. The value of
such property in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to taxation.
(c) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the tax commissioner
of Columbia County, giving such information relative to receiving such exemption as will
enable the tax commissioner of Columbia County to make a determination regarding the
initial and continuing eligibility of such person for such exemption. The tax commissioner
of Columbia County shall provide application forms for this purpose.
(d) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year to year
so long as the person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this section
occupies such residence as a homestead. After a person has filed the proper application as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year, and the exemption shall continue to be allowed to such person. It
shall be the duty of any person granted the homestead exemption under subsection (b) of this
section to notify the tax commissioner of Columbia County in the event that such person for
any reason becomes ineligible for such exemption.
(e) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect any
state ad valorem taxes, county ad valorem taxes for county purposes, independent school
district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes, or municipal ad valorem taxes for
municipal purposes. The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall
be in addition to and not in lieu of any other homestead exemption applicable to Columbia
H. B. 783
- 2 -

LC 47 3625/AP
County school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes; provided, however, that
the exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall be reduced by the amount of the
assessed value of the homestead that is exempt pursuant to Code Section 48-5-44 of the
O.C.G.A.
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall apply to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The election superintendent of Columbia County shall call and conduct an election as
provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the Columbia
County school district for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct
that election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November, 2025, and shall issue
the call and conduct that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent
shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks
immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Columbia County. The ballot
shall have written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from
Columbia County school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes
( ) NO in the amount of $8,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for
residents of that school district?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
H. B. 783
- 3 -

LC 47 3625/AP
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by Columbia County. It shall
be the election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State.
The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and are
not intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this
section, any elector of the Columbia County school district may apply for a writ of
mandamus to compel the election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this
section. If the court finds that the election superintendent has not complied with this section,
the court shall fashion appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and
conduct such election on the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for
special elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 783
- 4 -